Maryland, session 2025, SB0740.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 25. HEALTH CARE EQUITY FOR WARRIOR SERVICE MEMBER
COMMUNITY MEMBERS.
24–2501.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “HEALTH CARE FACILITY” MEANS A FACILITY OR AN OFFICE
WHERE HEALTH CARE IS PROVIDED TO PATIENTS BY A HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER
– 1 –

Ch. 757 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
OR GROUP OF HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONERS LICENSED, CERTIFIED, OR OTHERWISE
AUTHORIZED BY LAW TO PROVIDE HEALTH CARE SERVICES.
(2) “HEALTH CARE FACILITY” INCLUDES:
(I) A HOSPITAL, AS DEFINED IN § 19–301 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(II) A FREESTANDING MEDICAL FACILITY, AS DEFINED IN §
19–3A–01 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(III) A NURSING FACILITY;
(IV) A RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT CENTER;
(V) A REHABILITATION FACILITY; AND
(VI) A FACILITY OPERATED BY THE DEPARTMENT, THE
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION, OR A HEALTH OFFICER.
(C) “SERVICE MEMBER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS AN ACTIVE DUTY
MEMBER OF:
(1) THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES;
(2) A RESERVE COMPONENT OF THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED
STATES; OR
(3) THE NATIONAL GUARD OF ANY STATE HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(D) “VETERAN” MEANS A FORMER SERVICE MEMBER WHO WAS
DISCHARGED FROM ACTIVE DUTY.
(E) (D) “WARRIOR SERVICE MEMBER COMMUNITY MEMBER” MEANS:
(1) A SERVICE MEMBER;
(2) A VETERAN;
(3) THE SPOUSE OF A SERVICE MEMBER OR VETERAN;
(4) A CHILD OF A SERVICE MEMBER OR VETERAN; OR
(5) A STEPCHILD OF A SERVICE MEMBER OR VETERAN.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 757
(E) “VETERAN” MEANS A FORMER SERVICE MEMBER WHO WAS
DISCHARGED FROM ACTIVE DUTY HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
24–2502.
(A) EACH HEALTH CARE FACILITY SHALL MAY SCREEN EACH PATIENT FOR
INFORMATION ON THE PATIENT’S ELIGIBILITY AS A WARRIOR SERVICE MEMBER
COMMUNITY MEMBER AND INCLUDE IN THE PATIENT’S MEDICAL RECORD WHETHER
THE PATIENT IS A WARRIOR SERVICE MEMBER COMMUNITY MEMBER.
(B) FOR THE PURPOSE OF IMPROVING HEALTH CARE EQUITY FOR WARRIOR
SERVICE MEMBER COMMUNITY MEMBERS, EACH HEALTH CARE FACILITY SHALL
MAY IDENTIFY WARRIOR SERVICE MEMBER COMMUNITY MEMBERS AS A
VULNERABLE POPULATION AND COMPLY WITH THE STANDARDS ASSOCIATED WITH
THE NATIONAL PATIENT SAFETY GOAL TO IMPROVE HEALTH CARE EQUITY
ESTABLISHED BY THE JOINT COMMISSION.
(C) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2026, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON:
(1) THE NEEDS OF WARRIOR COMMUNITY MEMBERS;
(2) THE EXTENT TO WHICH EACH HEALTH CARE FACILITY MEETS THE
NEEDS OF WARRIOR COMMUNITY MEMBERS IDENTIFIED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION; AND
(3) A DESCRIPTION OF PROGRESS MADE TOWARD HEALTH CARE
EQUITY FOR WARRIOR COMMUNITY MEMBERS.
Article – State Government
9–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the Board of Trustees of the Maryland Veterans Trust.
(c) “Department” means the Department of Veterans and Military Families.
(D) “RESERVE COMPONENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 37 U.S.C. § 101.
– 3 –

Ch. 757 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(d)] (E) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Veterans and Military Families.
(F) “SERVICE MEMBER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A MEMBER OF:
(1) THE UNIFORMED SERVICES; OR
(2) A RESERVE COMPONENT OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES.
[(e)] (G) “Trust” means the Maryland Veterans Trust.
(H) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 37 U.S.C. § 101.
[(f)] (I) Except as otherwise provided [in this subtitle], “veteran” [means an
individual who served on active duty in the armed forces of the United States, other than for
training, and was discharged or released under conditions other than dishonorable] HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN 38 U.S.C. § 101.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 4 –